apertium-frp.frp.metadix
<pardef n="f/âre__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>âre</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ére</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" a="stich" c="use_sub"><p><l>êre</l><r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>asent</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>assent</l>    <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>êt</l>        <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>êts</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ête</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>êta</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>êtes</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>é</l>         <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eso</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ouè</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>és</l>        <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>âs</l>        <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ét</l>        <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ât</l>        <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ens</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ons</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>essens</l>    <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>essons</l>    <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esens</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esons</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éde</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>éte</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eséd</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>esséd</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ont</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ant</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>esê</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>assévo</l>    <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>asévo</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esês</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>asséves</l>   <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aséves</l>    <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esêt</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>asséve</l>    <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aséve</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esans</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>assévans</l>  <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>asévans</l>   <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esâd</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>assévâd</l>   <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>asévâd</l>    <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esant</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>assévant</l>  <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>asévant</l>   <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR" c="stich"><p><l>esiant</l><r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>aré</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arés</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arat</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arens</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arons</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aréd</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aront</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eré</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erés</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erat</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erens</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erons</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eréd</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eront</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>arê</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arên</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arês</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arêt</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arans</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arians</l>    <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arâd</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ariâd</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>arant</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ariant</l>    <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erê</l>       <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erên</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erês</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erêt</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erans</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>erians</l>    <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erâd</l>      <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eriâd</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erant</l>     <r>âre<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="fâre">            <i>f</i><par n="f/âre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stupèfâre" a="alanfavre"><i>stupèf</i><par n="f/âre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fâre sembllant" a="alanfavre"><i>f</i><par n="f/âre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>sembllant</l><r><g><b/>sembllant</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fâre contraste" a="alanfavre"><i>f</i><par n="f/âre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>contraste</l><r><g><b/>contraste</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="refâre">          <i>ref</i><par n="f/âre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dèfâre" a="stich"><i>dèf</i><par n="f/âre__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fâre sôtar" a="alanfavre"><i>f</i><par n="f/âre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>sôtar</l><r><g><b/>sôtar</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fâre la puta" a="alanfavre"><i>f</i><par n="f/âre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>la<b/>puta</l><r><g><b/>la<b/>puta</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fâre un cllopèt" a="alanfavre"><i>f</i><par n="f/âre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>un<b/>cllopèt</l><r><g><b/>un<b/>cllopèt</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fâre homâjo" a="alanfavre"><i>f</i><par n="f/âre__vblex"/><p><l><b/>homâjo</l><r><g><b/>homâjo</g></r></p></e>
